Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1307
Bonds; notes; legal investment.

The bonds and notes of a commission are hereby made securities in which all public officers, boards, agencies and bodies of the state, its counties, political subdivisions, public corporations, and municipalities and the officers, boards, agencies or bodies of any of them, all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business, all banks, trust companies, savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons who are now or who may hereafter be authorized to invest in notes, bonds or other obligations of this state, may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Notwithstanding any other provision of law the bonds are also hereby made securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers, boards, agencies, and bodies of this state, its counties, political subdivisions, public corporations and municipalities and the officers, boards, agencies or bodies of any of them for any purpose for which the deposit of notes, bonds or obligations of the state is now or may be hereafter authorized.

Laws 1971, LB 1003, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2607.